Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202543-250.01
Juvenile probationer; custody; notify juvenile intake probation officer.

If a peace officer takes a juvenile probationer into custody for a criminal violation as defined in section 43-286.01, the peace officer shall immediately take reasonable measures to notify a juvenile intake probation officer.

Laws 2025, LB530, § 11.